Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2 Administration, Enforcement, Prohibited Acts
57-4-203. Prohibited practices — Hours of sale — Authority of commission — Penalties.

Exterior Signs.

No licensee shall place any sign of any description on the exterior of the licensee's hotel, convention center, premier type tourist resort, restaurant, or club which is not in compliance with all duly adopted local ordinances relative to such exterior signs.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Sales to Minors Prohibited.

Any licensee or other person who sells, furnishes, disposes of, gives, or causes to be sold, furnished, disposed of, or given, any alcoholic beverage to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age commits a Class A misdemeanor and shall be punished in accordance with § 39-15-404, as well as any other applicable section.

Any licensee engaging in business regulated hereunder or any employee thereof who sells, furnishes, disposes of, gives, or causes to be sold, furnished, disposed of, or given any beer or malt beverage as defined in § 57-6-102 to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

The commission may, upon finding that a licensee has violated subdivision (b)(1)(A) or (b)(1)(B) two (2) or more times during any two-year period, and for good cause shown, fine the licensee not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and require retraining of all employees of the licensee under the supervision of the commission in lieu of suspending or revoking the license of the licensee.

Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who:

Purchases, attempts to purchase, receives, or has in such person's possession in any public place, any alcoholic beverage, commits a Class A misdemeanor; or

Knowingly makes a false statement or exhibits false identification to the effect that the licensee is twenty-one (21) years of age or older to any person engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages for the purpose of purchasing or obtaining the same commits a Class A misdemeanor.

If a person violating this subdivision (b)(2)(B) is less than eighteen (18) years of age, such person shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) or not less than twenty (20) hours of community service work, which fine or penalty shall not be suspended or waived. The fine imposed by this subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i) shall apply regardless of whether the violator cooperates with law enforcement officers by telling them the place the alcohol was purchased or obtained or from whom it was purchased or obtained.

If the person violating this subdivision (b)(2)(B) is eighteen (18) years of age or older but less than twenty-one (21) years of age, such person shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment in the local jail or workhouse for not less than five (5) days nor more than thirty (30) days. The penalties imposed by this subdivision (b)(2)(B)(ii) apply regardless of whether the violator cooperates with law enforcement officers by telling them the place the alcohol was purchased or obtained or from whom it was purchased or obtained.

In addition to any criminal penalty established by this section, a court in which a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age is convicted of the purchase, attempt to purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages, or the making of a false statement or exhibition of false identification for the purpose of purchasing or obtaining alcoholic beverages in violation of this section, shall prepare and send to the department of safety, driver control division, within five (5) working days of the conviction an order of denial of driving privileges for the offender.

The court and the department of safety shall follow the same procedures and utilize the same sanctions and costs for an offender younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older as provided in title 55, chapter 10, part 7, for offenders younger than eighteen (18) years of age but thirteen (13) years of age or older.

This chapter does not prohibit any person eighteen (18) years of age or older from selling, transporting, possessing or dispensing alcoholic beverages in the course of such person's employment.

Other Prohibited Sales.

It is unlawful for any licensee or other person to sell or furnish any alcoholic beverage to any person who is known to be insane or mentally defective, or to any person who is visibly intoxicated, or to any person who is known to habitually drink alcoholic beverages to excess, or to any person who is known to be an habitual user of narcotics or other habit-forming drugs.

A violation of subdivision (c)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Hours of Sale.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(5), hotels, clubs, zoological institutions, public aquariums, museums, motels, convention centers, restaurants, community theaters, theater, historic interpretive centers, sports authority facilities, and urban park centers, licensed as provided herein to sell alcoholic beverages, and/or malt beverages, and/or wine may not sell, or give away, alcoholic beverages and/or malt beverages and/or wine between the hours of three o'clock a.m. (3:00 a.m.) and eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) on weekdays, or between the hours of three o'clock a.m. (3:00 a.m.) and twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on Sundays.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(5), hotels, motels and restaurants, licensed under § 57-4-102(27)(B) may not sell or give away alcoholic beverages, and/or malt beverages and/or wine between the hours of one o'clock a.m. (1:00 a.m.) and eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) on weekdays or between the hours of one o'clock a.m. (1:00 a.m.) and twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on Sundays.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(5), establishments in a terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport and commercial airline travel clubs licensed as provided herein to sell alcoholic beverages, and/or malt beverages, and/or wine, may not sell, or give away, alcoholic beverages and/or malt beverages and/or wine between the hours of three o'clock a.m. (3:00 a.m.) and eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) on weekdays or between the hours of three o'clock a.m. (3:00 a.m.) and twelve o'clock noon (12:00) on Sundays.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(5), licensees under § 57-4-102(28) may not sell or give away alcoholic beverages and/or malt beverages and/or wine between the hours of five o'clock a.m. (5:00 a.m.) and eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) on weekdays or between the hours of five o'clock a.m. (5:00 a.m.) and twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on Sundays.

The commission is authorized to extend the hours of sale in the jurisdictions which have approved the sale of liquor by the drink by referendum; provided, however, that such extension of hours as well as § 57-5-301(b)(5) shall apply to Sunday sales of beer within the area of the county outside a municipality which approves liquor by the drink by referendum unless the county legislative body by a two-thirds (2/3) vote sets the hours for Sunday sales of beer in accordance with § 57-5-301(b)(1) to apply within such area. Upon petition by any licensee or group of licensees under this chapter, the commission may, after conducting a rule-making hearing pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, adopt rules expanding the hours during which it is legal to sell or give away alcoholic beverages, malt beverages and wine, pursuant to this chapter. The commission is hereby directed to consider such factors as the hours of sales in contiguous states and the need to compete with jurisdictions elsewhere in the country for convention and tourism business. The governing body of any municipality or metropolitan government which has approved liquor by the drink by referendum may, at any time, opt out of any extension of hours adopted under this section by passage of a resolution. Further, any municipality or metropolitan government that has opted out may, at a later date, opt in by passage of a resolution.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(5), licensees under § 57-4-102(30)(J) and (K) shall not sell or give away alcoholic beverages, malt beverages, or wine between the hours of three o'clock a.m. (3:00 a.m.) and four o'clock a.m. (4:00 a.m.).

Restrictions on Sealed or Unsealed Packages, or Gifts.

No licensee hereunder shall sell any wine or other alcoholic beverage in any sealed or unsealed package to any patrons or customers for consumption off its premises. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a restaurant licensed under this chapter may permit a customer who purchases an unsealed package of wine in conjunction with a food purchase and consumes a portion of the wine on the premises to remove the partially filled package from the premises. In addition, a licensee holding a license issued pursuant to §§ 57-4-102(14) and (34) may sell and distribute alcoholic beverages and wine in unsealed containers to the occupant of a suite located within a sports authority facility or a convention center; provided, that such occupant is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, is authorized by the lessee of the suite to receive such alcoholic beverages and wine, and the alcoholic beverage or wine is not removed from the sports authority facility or convention center.

A licensee shall not give away any such sealed package or any drink of wine or alcoholic beverage to any patron or customer; provided, that:

A hotel licensed under this chapter may include as part of the accommodations to a registered guest the provision of up to four (4) seven hundred fifty milliliter (750 ml.) or smaller complimentary sealed packages of wine or alcoholic beverages for which all applicable taxes have been paid; and

A licensee may serve a sample of wine to a patron or customer that does not exceed one ounce (1 oz.).

The tax required by chapter 4, part 3 of this title shall be paid upon the normal sales price of any such packages of wines provided under this subsection (e).

A restaurant or limited service restaurant may sell beer for consumption off premises upon meeting the requirements of § 57-5-101(c)(1)(B).

Method of Sale. Sales of wine and alcoholic beverages by licensees hereunder shall be conducted in the same manner as the sale of food is regularly conducted by such hotels, convention centers, premier type tourist resorts, restaurants, or clubs, except that no curb service of such beverages is lawful.

Ownership of Alcoholic Beverages Sold.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any licensee hereunder to sell or serve on the licensee's premises any wine or other alcoholic beverage unless such beverage is owned outright by the licensee.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to sell wine or other alcoholic beverage as authorized herein without complying with the applicable provisions of this chapter.

This subsection (g) shall not apply to events held by special occasion licensees who receive donated alcoholic beverages or beer.

Restrictions on Employment. No entity holding a license issued pursuant to § 57-4-101 shall employ any person in the serving of beer, wine or other alcoholic beverages who does not possess a server permit from the commission. It is made the duty of the licensee to see that each person dispensing or serving alcoholic beverages, wine or beer in the licensee's establishment possesses such a permit, which permit must be on the person of such employee or on the premises of the licensed establishment and subject to inspection by the commission or its duly authorized agent when the employee is engaged in the performance of that employee's duties for the licensee.

Premises Must Be Licensed — Exception for Conventions, Social Gatherings and Catered Events.

Except with respect to a caterer licensed under this chapter, it is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or association to allow the dispensing of alcoholic beverages except sacramental wines and beer, in any establishment unless such establishment is licensed under this title.

A violation of subdivision (i)(1)(A) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Bona fide conventions or meetings, however, may bring their own alcoholic beverages onto the licensed premises if the same beverages are served to delegates or guests without cost. All other provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to such premises. This section has no application to social gatherings in a private home or a private place which is not of a commercial nature or where goods or services may be purchased or sold or any charge or rent or other thing of value is exchanged for the use thereof, excepting it be for sleeping quarters. Nothing herein shall preclude the serving of alcoholic beverages to guests without cost in rooms or suites or banquet rooms of a hotel or club licensed pursuant to this chapter.

A restaurant, hotel, or caterer holding a valid catering license may sell or distribute wine, beer, and other alcoholic beverages at social or commercial events, catered by the restaurant, hotel, or caterer where the restaurant, hotel, or caterer is providing food service at such event; provided, that the restaurant, hotel, or caterer shall notify the commission as to the time, location and duration of the catered event before the commencement of the event. Nothing in this subdivision (i)(3) or chapter shall be interpreted to require a person who holds a valid caterer license under this chapter to also be licensed as a restaurant or hotel.

Penalties Invoked.

Any person, firm or corporation who violates any provision of parts 1 and 2 of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and, in the discretion of the court, imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days, nor more than six (6) months, and each violation constitutes a separate offense.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall sell wine or other alcoholic beverages for consumption on its premises except as authorized by parts 1 and 2 of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable as provided in this section.

Upon conviction of a second offense under this chapter, the permit of any licensee so convicted shall be automatically and permanently revoked.

Upon the second conviction of any person, firm, or corporation for violation of subdivision (b)(1), such person, firm, or corporation is guilty of a Class E felony. In addition, upon the second such conviction, the permit of such licensee shall be automatically and permanently revoked regardless of any other punishment actually imposed.

Purchases by Special Occasion Licensees.

No charitable, nonprofit or political organization possessing a special occasion license shall purchase for sale or distribution under such license any alcoholic beverages from any source other than a licensee under § 57-3-204. This subsection (k) shall not apply to homemade wine made in the Swiss tradition by a member or members of a special occasion permit holder issued a license pursuant to § 57-4-102(33)(D). The member may supply the wine notwithstanding the limitations of § 57-3-207(e).

A charitable, nonprofit, or political organization, or any representative thereof, may accept donations of alcoholic beverages and beer from any licensee holding a license issued pursuant to § 57-3-202, § 57-3-203, § 57-3-204, § 57-3-207, § 57-3-605 or § 57-4-101; provided, that the charitable, nonprofit, or political organization serves or sells such alcoholic beverages and beer at an event conducted by the charitable, nonprofit, or political organization as a special occasion licensee.

Commercial Airline Travel Clubs. A commercial airline travel club licensed under this chapter may provide complimentary drinks of wine and alcoholic beverages to its patrons, customers, and guests. Such commercial airline travel club must have a separate area, other than the gate and ticket areas, designated as a club area for use by its members. The tax required by part 3 of this chapter shall be paid upon the normal sales price of all such complimentary drinks of wine and alcoholic beverages provided under this subsection (l ).

Discounts. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a licensee from offering a discount in such manner as the licensee deems appropriate as long as the discount being offered is not below the cost paid by the licensee to purchase the alcoholic beverages from the retailer.

Restrictions on Certain Limited Service Restaurant Licensees. Any establishment holding a license pursuant to § 57-4-301(b)(1)(W)(iv) shall not permit alcoholic beverages to be sold on sidewalks, streets, or alleys.

Extension of Credit by Wholesalers to Retailers.

No wholesaler licensed under § 57-3-203 shall be permitted to extend credit of any retailer licensed under § 57-4-101 unless pursuant to this subsection (o). All amounts due to any wholesaler from all sales to such retailers shall be due upon delivery of the product.

Notwithstanding the limitations of subdivision (o)(1), wholesalers licensed under § 57-3-203 may extend credit to a retailer licensed under § 57-4-101 for a period not to exceed ten (10) days from the date of the delivery of the product; provided, the payment is effected by electronic funds transfer or escrow prepayment.

It shall create a rebuttable presumption that a retailer licensed under § 57-4-101 is not financially responsible under § 57-3-104(c)(10) if the retailer fails to satisfy its obligations to any wholesaler in accordance with each wholesaler's credit terms twice within a twelve-month period. Upon being advised by any wholesaler licensed under § 57-3-203 twice within a twelve-month period that a retailer has failed to comply with the applicable credit terms, the commission shall set a hearing as soon as practicable at its next available meeting to determine whether the retailer can rebut the presumption created by this subdivision (o)(3). Upon a finding that the retailer is not financially responsible under § 57-3-104(c)(10), the commission may issue a fine, suspend or revoke the license, or make any other order it deems appropriate.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commission is authorized to issue a citation in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per violation against any retailer licensed under § 57-4-101 if, upon investigation, the commission finds that the retailer has failed to satisfy its obligations to any wholesaler in accordance with each wholesaler's credit terms twice within a twelve-month period.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 1; 1969, ch. 336, § 1; 1970, ch. 451, § 2; 1971, ch. 224, § 1; 1972, ch. 612, § 9; 1972, ch. 682, § 4; 1972, ch. 756, § 5; 1973, ch. 397; 1975, ch. 277, § 1; 1975, ch. 340, § 1; 1979, ch. 256, § 1; 1979, ch. 377, § 1; 1979, ch. 401, § 4; 1979, ch. 413, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., § 57-156; Acts 1980, ch. 771, § 3; 1981, ch. 153, § 1; 1981, ch. 404, § 3; 1982, ch. 877, §§ 2, 3; 1983, ch. 454, §§ 2, 3; 1983, ch. 469, §§ 6, 7; 1984, ch. 569, § 1; 1984, ch. 975, §§ 6, 7; 1984, ch. 1006, § 3; 1986, ch. 697, § 1; 1986, ch. 788, § 1; 1986, ch. 899, §§ 7, 8; 1987, ch. 96, § 1; 1987, ch. 444, §§ 1, 8, 9; 1988, ch. 944, § 1; 1989, ch. 427, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 63, 111, 112, 113; 1991, ch. 407, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 473, §§ 2, 3; 1992, ch. 674, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 550, § 1; 1995, ch. 93, § 1; 1995, ch. 214, § 2; 1995, ch. 396, § 6; 1998, ch. 795, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 939, § 6; 2000, ch. 819, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 74, § 4; 2001, ch. 161, § 1; 2001, ch. 310, § 1; 2002, ch. 832, § 2; 2006, ch. 900, § 3; 2007, ch. 203, § 2; 2010, ch. 1009, § 6; 2011, ch. 231, § 1; 2012, ch. 947, § 5; 2012, ch. 968, §§ 7, 8; 2013, ch. 386, § 2; 2014, ch. 915, § 3; 2014, ch. 1001, § 6; 2014, ch. 1015, § 10; 2015, ch. 369, § 1; 2017, ch. 147, §§ 3-6; 2017, ch. 371, § 2; 2018, ch. 755, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provisions in subsections (g) and (j) may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-114,40-35-110,40-35-111.

The special penalty provisions for persons under 21 years of age provided for in subdivisions (b)(2)(B)(i) and (ii) may have been superseded by the amendment to subdivision (b)(2)(B) by Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111, of the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989.

Acts 2010, ch. 1009 was repassed over the governor's veto on June 4, 2010.

Acts 2011, ch. 231, § 2 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (d)(5), shall apply to the Sunday sale hours of beer in any county where a liquor-by-the-drink referendum was approved by a municipality in an election held within twelve (12) months prior to May 20, 2011 and on or after May 20, 2011.

For the Preamble to the act concerning legislative intent as to payments between wholesalers and retailers of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, see Acts 2015, ch. 369.

Acts 2018, ch. 755, which amended this section, contained two act sections 4. One of which amended §57-4-102, and the other was the effective date provision.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (e)(2) which read: “(2) No licensee shall give away any such sealed package or any drink of wine or alcoholic beverage to any patron or customer; provided, that any hotel licensed under this chapter may include as part of the accommodations to a registered guest the provision of up to four (4) seven hundred fifty milliliter (750 ml.) or smaller complimentary sealed packages of wine or alcoholic beverages which must have all appropriate taxes paid upon them.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 755, § 4. April 18, 2018.

Cross-References. Age of majority for purposes of purchasing, consuming, transporting alcoholic beverages, §§1-3-105,1-3-113.

Alcohol-related injuries, title 57, ch. 10.

Certain 1987 amendments to section inapplicable to certain counties, §57-4-104.

Eighteen-year-olds, legal responsibility, alcoholic beverage restrictions on persons under 21, §1-3-113.

False representations by minors, §§57-3-412,57-5-301.

Penalties for Class A, B and C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 12.

Law Reviews.

One Too Many: Sellers, Servers Must Know “How Much Is Too Much” to Avoid Alcohol Related Injuries (Mike Faulk), 43 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2007).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Cosmetologists, application of alcoholic beverage regulations to, OAG 96-089 (7/24/96).

Applicability of local beer permit ordinance to liquor-by-the-drink license holders, OAG 99-098 (4/30/99).

In a county that has not approved liquor by the drink by means of a county-wide referendum, but in which several municipalities have approved liquor by the drink, the hours for the sale of beer in areas of the county outside of incorporated municipalities and within those municipalities that have adopted liquor by the drink will be those set for the sale of liquor by the drink by the alcoholic beverage commission; thus, beer sales in these areas of the county may begin as early as 10:00 a.m. on Sundays, and this starting time for beer sales is applicable to sales by stores for off-premises consumption, as well as sales for consumption on the premises, OAG 02-23 (2/27/02).

In a county that has not approved liquor by the drink by means of a county-wide referendum, but in which several municipalities have approved liquor by the drink, and in which one incorporated municipality that has approved liquor by the drink decides by resolution to “opt out” of the expanded time for Sunday liquor-by-the-drink sales in order to return to the previous starting time of 12:00 noon, the hours for the sale of beer in areas of the county outside of incorporated municipalities and within those other municipalities that have adopted liquor by the drink will be those set for the sale of liquor by the drink by the alcoholic beverage commission, and, therefore, beer sales in these areas of the county may begin as early as 10:00 a.m. on Sundays, OAG 02-23 (2/27/02).

A civic center could legally permit alcoholic beverages to be served during private engagements, so long as the service is provided by a restaurant, hotel or licensed caterer who complies with the requirements of T.C.A. §§ 57-4- 101(i) and 57-4-203(i)(3), OAG 06-175 (12/8/06).

Hours for the sale of beer in a municipality located within a Tennessee River resort district. OAG 10-92, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (8/17/10).

Senate Bill 2415/House Bill 2027 of the 108th General Assembly (enacted as Public Chapter 1015), which requires liquor-by-the-drink licensees to make payment to wholesalers upon delivery of the product, does not violate equal protection under the United States or Tennessee Constitutions. OAG 14-61, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 63 (6/17/14).

57-4-204. Prohibited sexual or pornographic conduct — Enforcement.

In addition to the other duties imposed under this title, the commission is authorized to enforce subsections (b), (c), and (d); and upon violation of subsections (b), (c), and (d) by any person, firm or corporation licensed under this chapter, the commission shall revoke the privilege license of such violator.

The following acts or conduct on licensed premises are deemed contrary to public policy, and therefore no license shall be held at any premises where such conduct or acts are permitted:

To employ, use or allow any person in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages or malt beverages in or upon the licensed premises while such person is unclothed or in such attire, costume or clothing as to expose to view any portion of the female breast below the top of the areola or of any portion of the pubic hair, anus, cleft of the buttocks, vulva or genitals;

To employ, use or allow the services of any hostess or other person to mingle with the patrons while such hostess or other person is unclothed or in such attire, costume or clothing as described in subdivision (b)(1);

To encourage or permit any person on the licensed premises to touch, caress or fondle the breasts, buttocks, anus or genitals of any other person;

To permit any employee or person to wear or use any device or covering, exposed to view, which simulates the breast, genitals, anus, pubic hair or any portion thereof.

Conduct or acts on licensed premises in violation of this subsection (c) are deemed contrary to public policy, and therefore no license shall be held at any premises where such conduct or acts are permitted.

Live entertainment is permitted on any licensed premises, except that:

No licensee shall permit any person to perform acts of or acts which simulate:

Sexual intercourse, masturbation, sodomy, bestiality, oral copulation, flagellation or any sexual acts which are prohibited by law;

The touching, caressing or fondling of the breast, buttocks, anus or genitals; or

The displaying of the pubic hair, anus, vulva or genitals.

Subject to subdivision (c)(2)(A), any entertainer who is employed in whole or in part by the licensee to dance at such licensee's premises shall perform only upon a stage at least eighteen inches (18") above the immediate floor level and removed at least six feet (6') from the nearest patron.

No licensee shall permit any person to use artificial devices or inanimate objects to depict any of the prohibited activities described above.

No licensee shall permit any person to remain in or upon the licensed premises who exposes to public view any portion of the person's genitals or anus.

The following conduct or acts on licensed premises are deemed contrary to public policy, and therefore no license shall be held at any premises where such conduct or acts are permitted:

The showing of film, still pictures, electronic reproduction, or other visual reproductions depicting:

Acts or simulated acts of sexual intercourse, masturbation, sodomy, bestiality, oral copulation, flagellation or any sexual acts which are prohibited by law;

Any person being touched, caressed or fondled on the breast, buttocks, anus or genitals;

Scenes wherein a person displays the vulva or the anus or the genitals; or

Scenes wherein artificial devices or inanimate objects are employed to depict, or drawings are employed to portray, any of the prohibited activities described above.

Each county, city, or metropolitan government is empowered upon approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body to authorize its law enforcement officers to conduct investigations into alleged violations of subsections (a)-(d), and such law enforcement officers shall report such violations to the commission for appropriate action by such commission.

The commission shall be immune from liability resulting from conduct or acts of any law enforcement officers authorized to investigate violations of subsections (a)-(d) as provided in subsection (e).

Acts 1980, ch. 904, §§ 1-3.

57-4-205. Alcohol vaporizing devices.

As used in this section, “alcohol vaporizing device” means any device, machine or process that, by means of heat, a vibrating element or any other method, mixes spirits, liquor or other alcoholic product with pure oxygen or other gas to produce a vaporized product that is dispensed for inhalation into the lungs through the nose or mouth.

No licensee shall sell, deliver, or give away, or permit to be sold, delivered, or given away, any alcoholic beverage for dispensation by means of an alcohol vaporizing device.

No licensee shall bring, keep, maintain or use, or permit another to bring, keep, maintain or use, an alcohol vaporizing device on the licensed premises, or on any area related to the licensed business over which the licensee exercises control or for which the licensee is responsible.

A first violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor and is grounds for suspension of the licensee's license, for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days.

A second violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor and shall result in the suspension of the licensee's license, for a period of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days.

A third or subsequent violation of this section is a Class E felony and shall result in suspension of the licensee's license, for a period of one (1) year.

Acts 2005, ch. 402, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.